Arkansas statutes. Title 22 Public Property
Chapter 3 Public Buildings and Other Facilities
22-3-1216. Authorizing resolution as enforceable contract — Covenants.

Any authorizing resolution shall, together with this subchapter, constitute a contract between the Building Authority Division, and the State Board of Finance, and the Treasurer of State, which contract and all covenants, agreements, and obligations therein shall be promptly performed in strict compliance with its terms and provisions, and the covenants, agreements, and obligations of the division may be enforced by mandamus or other appropriate proceeding at law or in equity. In this regard, the division is expressly authorized to include in any authorizing resolution all or part of the following covenants:

(1)

That, to the fullest extent possible, the division will continuously operate any and all facilities constructed pursuant to the authority of this subchapter as revenue-producing undertakings, including the maintenance, occupancy, and use of facilities and space so as to avoid any impairment of the security for the certificates of indebtedness; and

(2)

That, to the fullest extent possible, the division will always charge, impose, and collect sufficient revenues, including, without limitation, rentals to meet as due all debt service requirements, and otherwise comply with any provisions of authorizing resolutions concerning revenues and funds.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 458, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-2613; Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 71; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 71; 2019, No. 910, § 6205.

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3, in the first paragraph, substituted “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas Building Authority” and “division” for “authority” twice.

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in the introductory language.

22-3-1217. Disposition of revenues from agricultural and livestock activities of correctional facility.

(a)(1)

Prior to the issuance of certificates of indebtedness as authorized by this subchapter, all moneys collected by the Division of Correction from the sale or disposition of farm products, livestock, or other products produced in connection with agricultural and livestock activities at institutions under the control of the Board of Corrections, from the rental of farm properties under the control of the board, and from payments from agencies of the state or federal government in connection with the farm operations of the division shall be deposited into the State Treasury as special revenues for credit to the Division of Correction Farm Fund, as authorized by law, to be used for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of the agriculture and farm programs of the division.

(2)

Moneys which the division shall determine not to be necessary in defraying expenses of operating the agriculture programs of the division and which are profit or surplus from the operation of the agriculture programs shall, upon certification by the board to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, be transferred by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State from the Division of Correction Farm Fund to the Division of Correction Inmate Care and Custody Fund Account within the State General Government Fund, to be used to supplement general revenues provided for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of the division, as provided by law.

(b)(1)

Commencing the first day of the month next succeeding the issuance of any certificates of indebtedness as authorized by this subchapter, the moneys described in this section shall be pledged revenues, as stated in §22-3-1210, and shall be deposited into the Public Facilities Debt Service Fund as established in §22-3-1210.

(2)

Any surplus prison farm moneys in the Public Facilities Debt Service Fund, as defined in the authorizing resolution, shall be transferred to the Division of Correction Farm Fund, upon certification by the Building Authority Division to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, to the Treasurer of State, and to the Auditor of State, to be used for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of the agriculture and farm programs of the Division of Correction, as provided by law.

(3)

Such moneys deposited into the Division of Correction Farm Fund which the Division of Correction shall determine not to be necessary in defraying expenses of operating the agriculture and farm programs of the Division of Correction shall be, upon certification thereof by the board to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, transferred by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State from the Division of Correction Farm Fund to the Division of Correction Inmate Care and Custody Fund Account within the State General Government Fund to be used to supplement general revenues provided for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of the Division of Correction, as provided by law.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 458, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-2611; Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 72; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 72; 2019, No. 910, §§ 1013, 6206.

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3, in (b)(2),
substituted “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas Building Authority” and “Department of Correction” for “department”.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and “division” for “department” throughout the section; and deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in (b)(2).

22-3-1218. Disposition of revenues from prison labor.

(a)(1)

Prior to the issuance of certificates of indebtedness as authorized by this subchapter, all moneys collected by the Board of Corrections from the sale or disposition of articles and products manufactured or produced by prison labor shall be forthwith deposited with the Treasurer of State, to be there kept and maintained as a special revolving account designated as the “Division of Correction Prison Industries Fund” as authorized by law. The moneys so collected and deposited shall be used solely for the purchase of manufacturing supplies, equipment, machinery, and buildings used to carry out the purposes of the industries program within the Division of Correction as well as for the payment of the necessary personnel in charge thereof and to otherwise defray the necessary expenses incident thereto, all of which shall be under the direction and subject to the approval of the board.

(2)

The Division of Correction Prison Industries Fund shall never be maintained in excess of the amount necessary to efficiently and properly carry out the intentions of this subchapter.

(3)

When, in the opinion of the board, the Division of Correction Prison Industries Fund has reached a sum in excess of the requirements of this subchapter, the excess shall be transferred, upon certification to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State by the board, to the Division of Correction Inmate Care and Custody Fund Account.

(b)(1)

Commencing on the first day of the month next succeeding the issuance of any certificates of indebtedness as authorized by this subchapter, the moneys described in this section shall be pledged revenues, as stated in §22-3-1210, and shall be deposited into the Public Facilities Debt Service Fund as established in §22-3-1210.

(2)

Any surplus prison industries moneys in the Public Facilities Debt Service Fund, as defined in the authorizing resolution, shall be transferred into the Division of Correction Prison Industries Fund upon certification by the Building Authority Division to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, to the Treasurer of State, and to the Auditor of State. The moneys are to be used for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of the prison industries programs of the Division of Correction, as provided by law.

(3)

Such moneys deposited into the Division of Correction Prison Industries Fund as the Division of Correction shall determine not to be necessary in defraying the expenses of operating the industries programs of the Division of Correction, upon certification thereof by the board to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, shall be transferred by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State from the Division of Correction Prison Industries Fund to the Division of Correction Inmate Care and Custody Fund Account within the State General Government Fund to be used to supplement general revenues provided for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of the Division of Correction, as provided by law.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 458, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-2612; Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 73; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 73; 2019, No. 910, § 1014.

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3, in (b)(2),
substituted “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas Building Authority” in the first sentence and “Department of Correction” for “department” in the second sentence.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction Prison Industries Fund” for “Department of Correction Prison Industries Fund” throughout the section; substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in the second sentences of (a)(1) and (b)(2), and in (b)(3); and, in (b)(3), substituted “Division of Correction Inmate Care and Custody Fund Account” for “Department of Correction Inmate Care and Custody Fund Account” and “Division of Correction” for “department” preceding “upon certification”.

22-3-1219. Employment of architects and other professionals — Notice for bids for construction.

(a)

The Building Authority Division is authorized to employ architects to prepare plans, specifications, and estimates of costs for the construction of any and all facilities authorized by the provisions of this subchapter and to supervise and inspect the construction.

(b)

After the division has approved the plans and specifications prepared by the architect, the division shall proceed to advertise for bids and contract for the construction of facilities in accordance with applicable laws governing the construction of public buildings.

(c)

The division is authorized to engage and pay such professional, technical, and other help as the division determines to be necessary or desirable in assisting the division to carry out effectively the authorities, functions, powers, and duties conferred and imposed upon the division by this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 458, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-2616; Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 74; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 74; 2019, No. 910, § 6207.

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3
substituted “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas Building Authority” in (a); in (b), substituted “division has” for “authority shall have”, “the division” for “it”, and deleted “any and all” preceding “facilities”; and, in (c), substituted “division” for “authority”, “the division determines” for “it shall determine”, and “the division” for “it” twice.

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in (a).

22-3-1220 — 22-3-1224. [Reserved.]

(a)

The Arkansas Development Finance Authority shall establish in its records a trust fund to be entitled the “Prison Construction Trust Fund”. All moneys derived by or remitted to the Arkansas Development Finance Authority, from the sale of annual license plate validation decals, pursuant to §27-14-1015(c), shall be deposited to the credit of the Prison Construction Trust Fund. The moneys in the Prison Construction Trust Fund shall not be general funds or revenues of the Arkansas Development Finance Authority and shall not be subject to the claims of the general creditors of the Arkansas Development Finance Authority.

(b)

The Arkansas Development Finance Authority shall pay from the Prison Construction Trust Fund into the Public Facilities Debt Service Fund created by §§19-5-932 and22-3-1210 the amount necessary, when added to other funds listed in §22-3-1210, to pay the next-succeeding principal and interest payment for the certificates of indebtedness, but not to exceed twenty-five cents (25¢) times the number of annual license plate validation decals sold by the Department of Finance and Administration in each six-month period. Such payments shall be made by the Arkansas Development Finance Authority semiannually two (2) business days prior to each July 1 and January 1 so long as the certificates of indebtedness permitted by the Public Facilities Finance Act of 1983, §22-3-1201 et seq., are outstanding. All such payments by the Arkansas Development Finance Authority to the Public Facilities Debt Service Fund shall cease when the certificates of indebtedness have been paid or redeemed.

(c)

All other funds in the Prison Construction Trust Fund shall be segregated, held, and used by the Arkansas Development Finance Authority solely to fund, or to provide for the funding of, the construction and equipping of:

(1)

Correction or prison facilities to be used by the Division of Correction;

(2)

Regional jail facilities operated by the Division of Correction; or

(3)

Regional jail facilities operated jointly by cities, counties, or regional jail commissions.

(d)

The Arkansas Development Finance Authority shall be authorized to fund or to provide for the funding of facilities described in subdivisions (c)(1)-(3) of this section by loans, leases, other contracts, or the issuance of bonds all in accordance with the provisions of the Arkansas Development Finance Authority Act, §15-5-101 et seq., and §§15-5-201 —15-5-211,15-5-213, and15-5-301 —15-5-316, and to pledge the cash funds collected by it from the sale of annual license plate validation decals and deposited into the Prison Construction Trust Fund, after payment of the amounts as specified in subsection (b) of this section to the repayment of any loans, leases, contracts, or bonds.

(e)

The Arkansas Development Finance Authority shall not fund or provide for the funding of any facility described in subsection (c) of this section to be operated or utilized by the Division of Correction unless the project, the plans therefor, and the construction thereof have been reviewed and approved by the Building Authority Division. The Arkansas Development Finance Authority shall not fund or provide for the funding of any other regional jail facility not utilized by the Division of Correction unless the project is in compliance with the minimum standards for jail facilities adopted by the state.

History.

Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 86, § 8; 1997, No. 974, §§ 12-14; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 75; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 75; 2019, No. 910, §§ 1015, 1016.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 86, § 1, provided:

“The General Assembly of the state of Arkansas hereby finds and declares that it is critical for the state to find methods to obtain additional correction facilities and regional jails for use by the Arkansas Department of Correction and the cities and counties within the state in order to alleviate severe jail overcrowding. It has also determined that it is in the best interest of the state to provide a means by which the Arkansas Development Finance Authority can finance the construction and equipping of such correction and jail facilities and to provide a source of cash funds to the Authority to be used solely for such purposes.”

Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 86, § 9, provided:

“Nothing in this act shall be construed to prohibit any other source of financing or funding, either public or private, for the construction of correction facilities and regional jails.”

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3
substituted “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas Building Authority” in (e).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in (c)(1), (c)(2), and (e) twice; and deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” at the end of the first sentence of (e).

Cross References.

Authority of Director of Department of Finance and Administration to implement provisions of this section, §27-13-103.

22-3-1226. [Transferred.]

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1997, No. 974, § 19, was codified as §22-3-1226 in error. Acts 1997, No. 974, § 19, is codified as §27-13-103.

Subchapter 13

— Vendors

Effective Dates.

Acts 1969, No. 201, § 16: Mar. 7, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that at the present time there is no law in this state which gives blind persons a preference in the establishment of vending facilities on state property; that it is the policy of this state to assist blind persons to become self-supporting; that the giving of such preference will further the policy of the state to promote employment of the blind; and, that this act is immediately necessary to accomplish this purpose. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in effect from the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 906, § 4: Apr. 7, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the cafeteria facilities located in the State Capitol were not intended to be included under Acts 1969, No. 201, in the giving of preference to blind persons in the establishment of vending facilities on state property, and that said cafeteria facilities are currently deemed necessary for the interest of the employees of the state. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in effect from the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 768, § 3: Mar. 24, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Section 1 of Act 906 of 1975 needs immediate amending because of the present requirement of the Department of Correction to forward profits from these vending facilities to the Arkansas Vending Stand Program for the Blind. These profits aid in funding of services for the Department of Correction employees that otherwise would be unavailable. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 1049, § 9: July 1, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Sixth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1987 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1987 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1987.”

Acts 1991, No. 1022, § 5: Apr. 8, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly that clarification needs to be provided in existing law concerning the affect of student program changes on licensed vending facilities operated by blind persons. That this act provides such clarification and also provides a mechanism for resolution of the current situation. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1999, No. 750, § 5: Mar. 22, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain private businesses have entered into lease agreements in state-owned buildings with State Building Services and have invested valuable time and money to build small businesses in reliance on those agreements, that some of those businesses are now threatened with termination by effect of law without recourse or appeal, and that it creates an inequitable situation which can only be remedied by changing the law to allow for an extension of those leases in effect on June 1, 1999 with State Building Services. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

22-3-1301. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

“Blind” or “blind person” means a person having not more than

20

/

200

visual acuity in the better eye with correcting lenses, or visual acuity greater than

20

/

200

but with a limitation in the field of vision such that the widest diameter of the visual field subtends an angle of no greater than twenty degrees (20°);

(2)

“Blind operator” and “blind vending facility operator” mean a blind person, as defined in subdivision (1) of this section, who is licensed by the licensing agency to operate a vending facility, as defined in subdivision (8) of this section;

(3)

“Licensing agency” means the Division of Services for the Blind of the Department of Human Services;

(4)

“Regular vending facility” means a vending facility where food preparation or cooking is not done on state property;

(5)

“State agency” means a department, commission, agency, or instrumentality of state government or operation;

(6)

“State agency administrator” means the head of each department, commission, or agency, or constitutional officer or official, in control of the maintenance, operation, and protection of state property;

(7)

“State property” or “state building” means buildings and land owned, leased, or otherwise controlled by the state, except the cafeteria located in the State Capitol; and

(8)

“Vending facility” means a snack bar, cafeteria, restaurant, cafe, concession stand, vending service from coin-operated machines, vending stands, cart service, or other facilities at which food, drinks, novelties, newspapers, periodicals, confections, souvenirs, tobacco products, or related items are regularly sold.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 201, § 13; 1975, No. 906, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-2585.

22-3-1302. Applicability.

This subchapter is not intended to cover the following vending facilities:

(1)

Vending facilities operated by universities and colleges or the vending facilities provided as an integral part of their services to students or as a training program for students;

(2)

Food service provided by hospitals or residential institutions of the state as a direct service to patients, inmates, correctional staff, trainees, or otherwise institutionalized persons; and

(3)

The cafeteria located in the basement of the State Capitol. However, the exemption of the cafeteria located in the basement of the State Capitol shall in no way affect the continued operation of the blind vending facility on the third floor of the State Capitol.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 201, § 12; 1975, No. 906, § 1; 1983, No. 768, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-2584.

22-3-1303. Preference to blind persons to operate vending facilities on state property.

(a)

For the purpose of assisting blind persons to become self-supporting and to further promote employment of the blind in Arkansas, state agency administrators shall assure that preference is given to the licensing agency in authorizing the operation of vending facilities on state property through the organized vending facility program operated by the licensing agency.

(b)

The licensing agency shall give preference in the assignment of state vending facilities to blind persons in need of employment who have been licensed to operate vending facilities in Arkansas for the dispensing of such items as, but not limited to, newspapers, periodicals, confections, tobacco products, and articles, including food and beverages, as may be dispensed automatically or manually and in accordance with all applicable health laws.

(c)

It shall be the duty of state agency administrators to negotiate and cooperate in good faith to accomplish the purpose of this subchapter to ensure that vending facilities operated on state property provide employment opportunities for the blind. Upon request of the licensing agency, state agency administrators shall prescribe rules designed both to assure that these facilities benefit the blind and to assure preference for licensed blind operators.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 201, §§ 1, 2, 9; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 80-2573, 80-2574, 80-2581; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 2360.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in the second sentence in (c).

Cross References.

Preference for licensed blind vendors, vocational-technical schools, §6-53-106.

22-3-1304. License required to operate vending facility.

No blind person may operate a vending facility, including any vending machine or other coin-operated device, on state property unless licensed to do so by the licensing agency.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 201, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-2576.

22-3-1305. Issuance of licenses.

(a)

The licensing agency shall issue licenses to operate vending facilities on state property to blind persons who are in need of employment and who are capable of efficiently operating the vending facility in a manner resulting in reasonable satisfaction for all parties concerned.

(b)

No blind person shall be issued a license as an operator until adequate training has been provided by the licensing agency.

(c)

The license is to be issued for an indefinite period of time and may be terminated by the licensing agency for just cause.

(d)

The license shall be issued to qualified blind individuals without regard to race, color, or national origin.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 201, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-2577.

22-3-1306. Duties of licensing agency upon request for vending facility.

Upon written or verbal request from a state agency administrator that a vending facility is desired on state property, or upon its own initiative, the licensing agency shall:

(1)

Survey the property, blueprints, plans, or other available information to determine if the installation of a vending facility would be feasible and profitable and notify the state agency administrator as to the plans of the licensing agency in regard to developing the vending facility; in new construction, the survey shall be conducted before construction contracts are awarded;

(2)

Provide adequate initial inventory and stocks to make vending facilities operational and provide and install proper equipment and fixtures for all regular vending facilities; and

(3)

Supervise the overall installation of equipment for the vending facility and supervise the blind licensed operator in the day-to-day operation and management of the vending facility to ensure compliance with the policies and procedures set down by mutual agreement between the licensing agency and the state agency administrator for whom the vending facility is to be provided.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 201, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-2575.

22-3-1307. Selection of location — Provision of utilities, space, and services.

(a)

The state agency administrators shall cooperate with the licensing agency in the selection of a suitable location for vending facilities and shall provide proper space, plumbing, lighting, and electrical outlets for the vending facility in the original planning and construction or in the alteration and renovation of present state property.

(b)

The state agency administrators shall provide necessary utilities, janitorial service, and garbage disposal for the operation of the vending facility.

(c)

Space for all vending facilities and their operational utility cost shall be provided rent-free by the state agency.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 201, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-2580.

22-3-1308. State property unable to support vending facility — Coin-operated machines.

(a)

State agency administrators of state property where the total number of persons using the property daily would produce insufficient profits, as determined by the licensing agency, to support a vending facility and a living wage for a blind person shall grant a preference to the licensing agency in securing proper coin-operated vending machines for the state property if the property houses or serves fifty (50) persons or more.

(b)

Profits from these coin-operated vending machines shall accrue to the Arkansas Vending Stand Program for the Blind to be used in the vending facility program for the blind under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 201, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-2579.

22-3-1309. Vending facilities for state property housing or serving fifty (50) or more persons.

(a)

In the design, construction, alteration, or renovation of state property housing or serving fifty (50) persons or more, there shall be included a satisfactory site or sites with space and electrical and plumbing outlets suitable for the location and operation of a vending facility. State property housing or serving fifty (50) persons or more shall include any space or building rented, leased, or otherwise acquired for use by any department, agency, or instrumentality of the state.

(b)

The licensing agency shall, before the letting of the contract, survey plans or blueprints in accordance with §22-3-1306(1).

(c)(1)

The vending facility shall be operated by a blind person if sufficient profit potential is available to produce a living wage.

(2)

If sufficient profit potential is not available, coin-operated vending machines may be installed in the site with the profits accruing to the Arkansas Vending Stand Program for the Blind.

(d)

In new construction, major alteration, or renovation of state property where, in the opinion of the state agency administrator, complete meal-type food service or cafeteria service is necessary, the heavy equipment necessary for the preparation, cooking, preserving, and serving of the food shall be furnished and installed as part of the overall construction, alteration, or renovation cost by the state agency.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 201, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-2582.

22-3-1310. Existing vending facilities operated by blind persons.

(a)

On state property where a vending facility is presently being operated by a blind licensed operator and before any additional or different provisions or arrangements are made for the sale or dispensing of articles or services of the type enumerated in §22-3-1303(b), the licensing agency shall be given an opportunity to determine if the articles or services might be sold or dispensed in a manner designed to provide additional income or employment opportunities for the blind through the licensing agency's program.

(b)

The responsibility for securing proper coin-operated vending machines or other vending facilities for the property shall be with the licensing agency, upon request by the state agency administrator.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 201, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-2578.

22-3-1311. Termination of contracts with sighted vendors.

On state property where vending facilities are being operated by those other than the blind, when the present contract or agreement expires or is terminated for any reason or when a change in the present vending facility is imminent, the future planned vending facility for such state property shall be covered by this subchapter, and state agency administrators shall contact the licensing agency to assure preference for the blind. Provided, however, leases executed under §22-2-114 prior to June 1, 1999, shall not be considered a contract or agreement within this subchapter if the property is owned by the Building Authority Division.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 201, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-2583; Acts 1999, No. 750, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 6208.

Amendments.

The 1999 amendment added the proviso; and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division”.

22-3-1312. Maintenance of physical facilities.

The Division of Services for the Blind of the Department of Human Services shall retain a portion of the proceeds derived from the vending stand program to be used for the benefit of maintaining the physical facilities of the vending stand program. The expenditures shall be limited to renovation of existing space, replacement of furniture or equipment, repairs, and other expenses necessary to maintain the vending stand program.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 1049, § 5.

22-3-1313. Food service training program — Vending facility.

(a)

Should a state agency operate or develop as an integral part of its student program a food service training program, the state agency administrator or governing board of the state-supported facility shall notify the licensing agency of the program change.

(b)

The licensing agency shall contract with the state agency administrator or governing board of the state-supported facility for any continuance of the vending facility located at the state agency. Such continuance shall provide for the existence of both the food service student training program and the vending facility, if possible. The state licensing agency shall determine the feasibility of such continuance.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1022, § 1.

Subchapter 14

— State Agencies Facilities Acquisition Act of 1991

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 1, provided:

“(a)

The General Assembly finds:

“(1)

State government provides vital functions that impact the lives of Arkansas citizens on a daily basis;

“(2)

While these functions are important, it is equally important to ensure that state government operates efficiently and effectively to eliminate unnecessary spending of tax dollars and provide timely and quality services to Arkansas citizens; and

“(3)

Issues such as the administrative organization of a governmental entity, the appointment structure of a governmental entity's governing board, and extraneous duties assigned to governmental entities hamper the operation of state government and result in unnecessary expenses and delays in the provision of state services.

“(b)

It is the intent of this act to amend provisions of law applicable to certain agencies, task forces, committees, and commission to promote efficiency and effectiveness in the operations of state government as a whole.”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1993, No. 829, § 6: Apr. 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that absence of authority for State Building Services to construct ancillary facilities to enhance the utilization of facilities now used for housing state agencies prevents the effecting of substantial savings and economies in housing state agencies which can only be alleviated by the passage of this act. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 153: July 1, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Building Authority, the Arkansas Science and Technology Authority, the Department of Rural Services, and the Division of Land Surveys of the Arkansas Agriculture Department are inefficiently structured; that this inefficient structuring causes an excessive and unnecessary cost to the taxpayers of the this state; and that this act is essential to alleviating that financial burden. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2015.”

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 129: May 23, 2016. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the membership and duties of certain agencies, task forces, committees, and commissions and repeals other governmental entities; that these revisions and repeals of governmental entities impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the provisions of this act should become effective as soon as possible to allow for implementation of the new provisions in advance of the upcoming fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.